Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201677-27,187
Act, how cited.

Sections 77-27,187 to 77-27,195 shall be known and may be cited as the
Nebraska Advantage Rural Development Act.

Laws 1986, LB 1124, § 1;

Laws 1987, LB 270, § 1;

Laws 1997, LB 886, § 1;

Laws 1998, LB 1104, § 14;

Laws 2002, LB 93, § 19;

Laws 2003, LB 608, § 1;

Laws 2005, LB 312, § 16;

Laws 2009, LB403, § 8;

Laws 2014, LB836, § 1.